District of Columbia statutes.
34-808.01

Competitive energy supplier consumer awareness program.

(a)

The Office of the People’s Counsel shall establish a program to increase the awareness of District residents of the availability of services offered by competitive energy providers and the means by which to procure such services.

(b)

The Public Service Commission shall establish a program to increase the awareness of District residents of the availability of services offered by competitive energy providers and the means by which to procure such services.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 995, ch. 150, § 8, par. 97A
as added Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 2026, 55 DCR 7598
Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-250, § 401, 55 DCR 9225

History

Short title: Section 2025 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle K of title II of the act may be cited as the “Competitive Energy Supplier Consumer Awareness Amendment Act of 2008”.

Short Title